Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6900HV (1) 91 da/js H.F. 2595 Section 1. MINING REGULATION. It is the intention of the 1 general assembly to enact legislation regulating mining in this 2 state, including under chapter 207 or 208. The legislation may 3 provide for any regulatory matters concerning mining, including 4 but not limited to the involvement of local authorities in the 5 process of approving and renewing licenses or permits, the 6 submission of evidence of financial responsibility, and the 7 submission of mapping information. 8